Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4148.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 282a. At its fall state convention of 1964, each political party may nominate 8 candidates for membership on the state board of education. Two candidates shall be nominated for 2-year terms, 2 for 4-year terms, 2 for 6-year terms and 2 for 8-year terms. At its fall state convention of 1966, and every 2 years thereafter, each political party may, subject to section 282b, nominate 2 candidates for membership on the state board of education. Sec. 282b. (1) This state is divided into 4 districts for each political party to select members to the state board of education. The districts are constituted as follows: (a) District 1 consists of the counties described in section 302(a) of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.302. (b) District 2 consists of the counties described in section 302(b) of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.302. (c) District 3 consists of the counties described in section 302(c) of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.302. (d) District 4 consists of the counties described in section 302(d) of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.302. (2) Each political party shall nominate candidates for membership on the state board of education as follows: (a) At its fall state convention of 2026, and every 8 years thereafter, each political party shall nominate for membership on the state board of education 1 candidate who is a resident of district 1 and 1 candidate who is a resident of district 4. (b) At its fall state convention of 2028, and every 8 years thereafter, each political party shall nominate for membership on the state board of education 1 candidate who is a resident of district 2 and 1 candidate who is a resident of district 3. (c) At its fall state convention of 2030, and every 8 years thereafter, each political party shall nominate for membership on the state board of education 1 candidate who is a resident of district 1 and 1 candidate who is a resident of district 4. (d) At its fall state convention of 2032, and every 8 years thereafter, each political party shall nominate for membership on the state board of education 1 candidate who is a resident of district 2 and 1 candidate who is a resident of district 3.